Utah statutes.
38-13-203.   Repossession of aircraft.
(1)  If a repairman is not in possession of the aircraft under Section
38-13-201, a repairman may take possession of an aircraft to recover the
amounts owed under a lien imposed by this chapter if:
(a)  the repairman obtains a foreclosure judgment under Section 38-13-202;
(b)  the repairman provides written notice of the intent to take possession of
the aircraft:
(i)  to:
(A)  the owner of the aircraft; and
(B)  any person described in Subsection 38-13-204(1)(b); and
(ii)  at least 15 days before the day on which the repairman takes possession
of the aircraft;
(c)  the aircraft is in the possession of one of the following if that person
requested that the repairman make, alter, repair, or perform labor on the
aircraft:
(i)  the owner of the aircraft; or
(ii)  other person entitled to possession of the aircraft; and
(d)  the person described in Subsection (1)(c) has not paid the amount owed
under this chapter before the day on which the repairman takes possession of
the aircraft.
(2)  Subject to the other requirements of this section, a repairman may take
possession of an aircraft under this section:
(a)  pursuant to judicial process; or
(b)  without judicial process, if the transfer of possession of the aircraft
proceeds without breach of the peace.
